Massachusetts, session 194th, H1465.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 19 of Chapter 15A of the Massachusetts General Laws, as appearing in the 2020
Official Edition, is hereby amended by adding the following paragraph:-
The Board of Higher Education shall institute, in conjunction with the Board of
Education, a program to allow any public school teacher or paraprofessional presently working
in the Commonwealth to attend courses at public institutions of Higher Education in the
Commonwealth at no tuition cost.
of 1